Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-149
Johnson.

The county of Johnson is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township four, north, of range nine, east; thence east to the southeast corner of section thirty-three in township four, north, of range twelve, east; thence north by section lines to the northeast corner of section four in township six, north, of range twelve, east; thence west to the northwest corner of township six, north, of range nine, east; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 30, p. 218;

R.S.1913, § 862;

C.S.1922, § 764;

C.S.1929, § 25-151;

R.S.1943, § 22-149.